Utah statutes.
31A-41-203.   Use of monies.
(1)  Monies in the fund may be used to pay claims made under Part 3, Claims on
Fund.
(2) (a)  Except as limited by Subsection (2)(b), monies in the fund in excess
of $250,000 may be used by the commissioner, with the consent of the
commission, to:
(i)  investigate violations of this chapter related to fraud by a title
insurance licensee;
(ii)  conduct education and research in the field of title insurance; or
(iii)  examine a title insurance licensee's:
(A)  escrow and trust account;
(B)  search and examine procedures; or
(C)  compliance with applicable statutes and rules.
(b)  The commissioner may not use more than 75% of monies collected under this
chapter in a fiscal year from assessments and interest for the purposes
outlined in this Subsection (2).
(3)  The disclosure of an examination conducted under this section is governed
by Section 31A-2-204.
